California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
Except as otherwise provided in this title, all persons whose names have been submitted for consideration for appointment or designation as arbitrators or conciliators, or who have been appointed or designated as such, shall, within 15 days, make a disclosure to the parties of any information which might cause their impartiality to be questioned including, but not limited to, any of the following instances:

(a) The person has a personal bias or prejudice concerning a party, or personal knowledge of disputed evidentiary facts concerning the proceeding.

(b) The person served as a lawyer in the matter in controversy, or the person is or has been associated with another who has participated in the matter during such association, or he or she has been a material witness concerning it.

(c) The person served as an arbitrator or conciliator in another proceeding involving one or more of the parties to the proceeding.

(d) The person, individually or a fiduciary, or such person’s spouse or minor child residing in such person’s household, has a financial interest in the subject matter in controversy or in a party to the proceeding, or any other interest that could be substantially affected by the outcome of the proceeding.

(e) The person, his or her spouse, or a person within the third degree of relationship to
either of them, or the spouse of such a person meets any of the following conditions:

(i) The person is or has been a party to the proceeding, or an officer, director, or trustee of a party.

(ii) The person is acting or has acted as a lawyer in the proceeding.

(iii) The person is known to have an interest that could be substantially affected by the outcome of the proceeding.

(iv) The person is likely to be a material witness in the proceeding.

(f) The person has a close personal or professional relationship with a person who meets any of the following conditions:

(i) The person is or has been a party to the proceeding, or an
officer, director, or trustee of a party.

(ii) The person is acting or has acted as a lawyer or representative in the proceeding.

(iii) The person is or expects to be nominated as an arbitrator or conciliator in the proceedings.

(iv) The person is known to have an interest that could be substantially affected by the outcome of the proceeding.

(v) The person is likely to be a material witness in the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.122.

The obligation to disclose information set forth in Section 1297.121 is mandatory and cannot be waived as to the parties with respect to persons serving either as the sole arbitrator or sole conciliator or as the chief or prevailing arbitrator or conciliator. The parties may otherwise agree to waive such disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.123.

From the time of appointment and throughout the arbitral proceedings, an arbitrator, shall, without delay, disclose to the parties any circumstances referred to in Section 1297.121 which were not previously disclosed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.124.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties or the rules governing the arbitration, an arbitrator may be challenged only if circumstances exist that give rise to justifiable doubts as to his or her independence or impartiality, or as to his or her possession of the qualifications upon which the parties have agreed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.125.

A party may challenge an arbitrator appointed by it, or in whose appointment it has participated, only for reasons of which it becomes aware after the appointment has been made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Challenge Procedure [1297.131. - 1297.136.]

1297.131.

The parties may agree on a procedure for challenging an arbitrator and the decision reached pursuant to that procedure shall be final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.132.

Failing any agreement referred to in Section 1297.131, a party which intends to challenge an arbitrator shall, within 15 days after becoming aware of the constitution of the arbitral tribunal or after becoming aware of any circumstances referred to in Sections 1297.124 and 1297.125, whichever shall be later, send a written statement of the reasons for the challenge to the arbitral tribunal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.133.

Unless the arbitrator challenged under Section 1297.132 withdraws from his or her office or the other party agrees to the challenge, the arbitral tribunal shall decide on the challenge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.134.

If a challenge following the procedure under Section 1297.133 is not successful, the challenging party may request the superior court, within 30 days after having received notice of the decision rejecting the challenge, to decide on the challenge. If a challenge is based upon the grounds set forth in Section 1297.121, and the superior court determines that the facts support a finding that such ground or grounds fairly exist, then the challenge should be sustained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.135.

The decision of the superior court under Section 1297.134 is final and is not subject to appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.136.

While a request under Section 1297.134 is pending, the arbitral tribunal, including the challenged arbitrator, may continue with the arbitral proceedings and make an arbitral award.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Failure or Impossibility to Act [1297.141. - 1297.144.]

1297.141.

The mandate of an arbitrator terminates if he becomes de jure or de facto unable to perform his or her functions or for other reasons fails to act without undue delay, and he withdraws from his or her office or the parties agree to the termination of his or her mandate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.142.

If a controversy remains concerning any of the grounds referred to in Section 1297.141, a party may request the superior court to decide on the termination of the mandate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.143.

A decision of the superior court under Section 1297.142 is not subject to appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.144.

If, under this section or Section 1297.132, an arbitrator withdraws from office or a party agrees to the termination of the mandate of an arbitrator, this does not imply acceptance of the validity of any ground referred to in Section 1297.132.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Termination of Mandate and Substitution of Arbitrators [1297.151. - 1297.154.]

1297.151.

In addition to the circumstances referred to under Article 4 (commencing with Section 1297.131) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 1297.141) of this chapter, the mandate of an arbitrator terminates upon his or her withdrawal from office for any reason, or by or pursuant to agreement of the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.152.

Where the mandate of an arbitrator terminates, a substitute arbitrator shall be appointed according to the rules that were applicable to the appointment of the arbitrator being replaced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.153.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties:

(a) Where the sole or presiding arbitrator is replaced, any hearings previously held shall be repeated.

(b) Where an arbitrator other than the sole or presiding arbitrator is replaced, any hearings previously held may be repeated at the discretion of the arbitral tribunal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.154.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, an order or ruling of the arbitral tribunal made prior to the replacement of an arbitrator under this section is not invalid because there has been a change in the composition of the tribunal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Jurisdiction of Arbitral Tribunals [1297.161. - 1297.180.]



  ARTICLE 1. Competence of an Arbitral Tribunal to Rule on its Jurisdiction [1297.161. - 1297.167.]

1297.161.

The arbitral tribunal may rule on its own jurisdiction, including ruling on any objections with respect to the existence or validity of the arbitration agreement, and for that purpose, an arbitration clause which forms part of a contract shall be treated as an agreement independent of the other terms of the contract, and a decision by the arbitral tribunal that the contract is null and void shall not entail ipso jure the invalidity of the arbitration clause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.162.

A plea that the arbitral tribunal does not have jurisdiction shall be raised not later than the submission of the statement of defense. However, a party is not precluded from raising such a plea by the fact that he or she has appointed, or participated in the appointment of, an arbitrator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.163.

A plea that the arbitral tribunal is exceeding the scope of its authority shall be raised as soon as the matter alleged to be beyond the scope of its authority is raised during the arbitral proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.164.

The arbitral tribunal may, in either of the cases referred to in Sections 1297.162 and 1297.163, admit a later plea if it considers the delay justified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.165.

The arbitral tribunal may rule on a plea referred to in Sections 1297.162 and 1297.163 either as a preliminary question or in an award on the merits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.166.

If the arbitral tribunal rules as a preliminary question that it has jurisdiction, any party shall request the superior court, within 30 days after having received notice of that ruling, to decide the matter or shall be deemed to have waived objection to such finding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.167.

While a request under Section 1297.166 is pending, the arbitral tribunal may continue with the arbitral proceedings and make an arbitral award.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Interim Measures Ordered by Arbitral Tribunals [1297.171. - 1297.180.]

1297.171.

(a) Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, the arbitral tribunal may, at the request of a party, grant interim measures of protection.

(b) An interim measure of protection, or interim measure, is any temporary measure, whether in the form of an award or in another form, by which, at any time prior to the issuance of the award by which the dispute is finally decided, the arbitral tribunal orders a party to do any of the following:

(1) Maintain or restore the status quo pending determination of the dispute.

(2) Take action that would prevent, or refrain from taking action that is likely to cause,
 current or imminent harm or prejudice to the arbitral process itself.

(3) Provide a means of preserving assets out of which a subsequent award may be satisfied.

(4) Preserve evidence that may be relevant and material to the resolution of the dispute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 9.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.172.

(a) The party requesting an interim measure under paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1297.171 shall satisfy the arbitral tribunal that both of the following conditions are met:

(1) Harm not adequately reparable by an award of damages is likely to result if the measure is not ordered, and such harm substantially outweighs the harm that is likely to result to the party against whom the measure is directed if the measure is granted.

(2) There is a reasonable possibility that the requesting party will succeed on the merits of the claim. The determination of this possibility shall not affect the discretion of the arbitral tribunal in making
 any subsequent determination.

(b) With regard to a request for an interim measure under paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1297.171, the requirements in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) shall apply only to the extent the arbitral tribunal considers appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 10.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.173.

(a) Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, a party may, without notice to any other party, make a request for an interim measure together with an application for a preliminary order directing a party not to frustrate the purpose of the interim measure requested.

(b) The arbitral tribunal may grant a preliminary order provided that it considers that prior disclosure of the request for the interim measure to the party against whom it is directed risks frustrating the purpose of the measure.

(c) The conditions defined under Section 1297.172 apply to any preliminary order, provided that the harm to be assessed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1297.172 is the harm
 likely to result from the order being granted or not.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 11.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.174.

(a) Immediately after the arbitral tribunal has made a determination with respect to an application for a preliminary order, the arbitral tribunal shall give notice to all parties of the request for the interim measure, the application for the preliminary order, the preliminary order, if any, and all other communications, including the content of any oral communication, between any party and the arbitral tribunal in relation thereto.

(b) At the same time, the arbitral tribunal shall give an opportunity to any party against whom a preliminary order is directed to present its case at the earliest practicable time.

(c) The arbitral tribunal shall decide promptly on any objection to
 the preliminary order.

(d) A preliminary order shall expire after twenty days from the date on which it was issued by the arbitral tribunal. However, the arbitral tribunal may issue an interim measure adopting or modifying the preliminary order, after the party against whom the preliminary order is directed has been given notice and an opportunity to present its case.

(e) A preliminary order shall be binding on the parties, but shall not be subject to enforcement by a court. Such a preliminary order does not constitute an award.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 12.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.175.

The arbitral tribunal may modify, suspend, or terminate an interim measure or a preliminary order it has granted upon application of any party, or in exceptional circumstances and upon prior notice to the parties, on the arbitral tribunal’s own initiative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 13.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.176.

(a) The arbitral tribunal may require the party requesting an interim measure to provide appropriate security in connection with the measure.

(b) The arbitral tribunal shall require the party applying for a preliminary order to provide security in connection with the order unless the arbitral tribunal considers it inappropriate or unnecessary to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 14.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.177.

(a) The arbitral tribunal may require any party to promptly disclose any material change in the circumstances on the basis of which the measure was requested or granted.

(b) The party applying for a preliminary order shall disclose to the arbitral tribunal all circumstances that are likely to be relevant to the arbitral tribunal’s determination whether to grant or maintain the order, and such obligation shall continue until the party against whom the order has been requested has had an opportunity to present its case. Thereafter, subdivision (a) shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 15.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.178.

The party requesting an interim measure or applying for a preliminary order shall be liable for any costs and damages caused by the measure or the order to any party if the arbitral tribunal later determines that, in the circumstances, the measure or order should not have been granted. The arbitral tribunal may award such costs and damages at any point during the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 16.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.179.

(a) An interim measure issued by an arbitral tribunal shall be recognized as final and binding, and, unless otherwise provided by the arbitral tribunal, may be enforced upon application to the superior court subject to the provisions of Section 1297.180. Nothing herein is intended to preclude enforcement of the interim measure in any other competent court.

(b) The party who is seeking or has obtained recognition or enforcement of an interim measure shall promptly inform the court of any termination, suspension, or modification of that interim measure.

(c) The superior court where recognition or enforcement is sought may, if the court considers it proper, order the requesting
 party to provide appropriate security if the arbitral tribunal has not already made a determination with respect to security or where such a decision is necessary to protect the rights of third parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 17.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.180.

(a) Recognition or enforcement of an interim measure may be refused only:

(1) At the request of the party against whom it is invoked if the court is satisfied that any of the following conditions are met:

(A) A party to the arbitration agreement was under some incapacity, or the said agreement is not valid under the law to which the parties have subjected it, or failing any indication thereon, under the law of the jurisdiction where the interim measure was made.

(B) The party against whom the interim measure is invoked was not given proper notice of the appointment of an arbitrator or of the arbitral proceedings or
 was otherwise unable to present its case.

(C) The interim measure deals with a dispute not contemplated by or not falling within the terms of the submission to arbitration, or it contains decisions on matters beyond the scope of the submission to arbitration, provided that, if the decisions on matters submitted to arbitration can be separated from those not so submitted, that part of the interim measure which contains decisions on matters submitted to arbitration may be recognized and enforced.

(D) The composition of the arbitral tribunal or the arbitral procedure was not in accordance with the agreement of the parties, or, failing such agreement, was not in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction where the arbitration took place.

(E) The arbitral tribunal’s decision with respect to the provision of security in
 connection with the interim measure issued by the arbitral tribunal has not been complied with.

(F) The court otherwise determines that the arbitral tribunal did not have jurisdiction pursuant to Section 1297.95.

(G) The interim measure has been terminated or suspended by the arbitral tribunal, or, where so empowered, by the court of the jurisdiction in which the arbitration took place or under the law of which that interim measure was granted.

(2) If the court finds that any of the following conditions are met:

(A) The interim measure is incompatible with the powers conferred upon the court, unless the court decides to reformulate the interim measure to the extent necessary to adapt the interim measure to its own powers and procedures for the purposes
 of enforcing that interim measure and without modifying its substance.

(B) The subject matter of the dispute is not capable of settlement by arbitration under the law of the United States.

(C) The recognition or enforcement of the interim measure would be contrary to the public policy of the United States.

(b) Any determination made by the court on any ground in subdivision (a) shall be effective only for the purposes of the application to recognize and enforce the interim measure. The court in which recognition or enforcement is sought shall not, in making that determination, undertake a review of the substance of the interim measure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 18.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Manner and Conduct of Arbitration [1297.181. - 1297.273.]



  ARTICLE 1. Equal Treatment of Parties [1297.181. - 1297.181.]

1297.181.

The parties shall be treated with equality and each party shall be given a full opportunity to present his or her case.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Representation by Foreign and Out-of-State Attorneys [1297.185. - 1297.189.]

1297.185.

For purposes of this article, a “qualified attorney” means an individual who is not admitted to practice law in this state but is all of the following:

(a) Admitted to practice law in a state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia or a member of a recognized legal profession in a foreign jurisdiction, the members of which are admitted or otherwise authorized to practice as attorneys or counselors at law or the
equivalent.

(b) Subject to effective regulation and discipline by a duly constituted professional body or public authority of that jurisdiction.

(c) In good standing in every jurisdiction in which he or she is admitted or otherwise authorized to practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 134, Sec. 1.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.186.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, including Section 6125 of the Business and Professions Code, a qualified attorney may provide legal services in an international commercial arbitration or related conciliation, mediation, or alternative dispute resolution proceeding, if any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The services are undertaken in association with an attorney who is admitted to practice in
this state and who actively participates in the matter.

(2) The services arise out of or are reasonably related to the attorney’s practice in a jurisdiction in which the attorney is admitted to practice.

(3) The services are performed for a client who resides in or has an office in the jurisdiction in which the attorney is admitted or otherwise authorized to practice.

(4) The services arise out of or are reasonably related to a matter that has a substantial connection to a jurisdiction in which the attorney is admitted or otherwise authorized to practice.

(5) The services arise out of a dispute governed primarily by international law or the law of a foreign or out-of-state jurisdiction.

(b) This section does not apply to a dispute or controversy concerning any of the following:

(1) An individual’s acquisition or lease of goods or services primarily for personal, family, or household use.

(2) An individual’s coverage under a health insurance plan or an interaction between an individual and a healthcare provider.

(3) An application for employment in California.

(4) The terms and conditions of, or right to, employment in California, unless the dispute or controversy primarily concerns intellectual property rights, including those involving trademarks, patents, copyright, and software programs.

(c) This section does not affect the right of an attorney admitted to
practice law in this state to provide legal services in an international commercial arbitration or related conciliation, mediation, or alternative dispute resolution proceeding, or the right of representation established in Section 1297.351.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 134, Sec. 1.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.187.

A qualified attorney rendering legal services pursuant to this article shall not appear in a court of this state unless he or she has applied for and received permission to appear as counsel pro hac vice pursuant to the California Rules of Court, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 134, Sec. 1.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.188.

(a) A qualified attorney rendering legal services pursuant to this article is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts and disciplinary authority of this state with respect to the California Rules of Professional Conduct and the laws governing the conduct of attorneys to the same extent as a member of the State Bar of California.

(b) The State Bar of California may report complaints and evidence of
disciplinary violations against an attorney practicing pursuant to this article to the appropriate disciplinary authority of any jurisdiction in which the attorney is admitted or otherwise authorized to practice law. This section does not limit or affect the authority of the State Bar to report information about an attorney to authorities in any jurisdiction in which the attorney is admitted or otherwise authorized to practice law.

(c) On or before May 1 of each year, the State Bar shall submit a report to the Supreme Court that specifies the number and nature of any complaints that it has received during the prior calendar year against attorneys who provide legal services pursuant to this article and any actions it has taken in response to those complaints.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 134, Sec. 1.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.189.

The Supreme Court may issue rules implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 134, Sec. 1.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Determination of Rules of Procedure [1297.191. - 1297.193.]

1297.191.

Subject to this title, the parties may agree on the procedure to be followed by the arbitral tribunal in conducting the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.192.

Failing any agreement referred to in Section 1297.191, the arbitral tribunal may, subject to this title, conduct the arbitration in the manner it considers appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.193.

The power of the arbitral tribunal under Section 1297.192 includes the power to determine the admissibility, relevance, materiality, and weight of any evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Place of Arbitration [1297.201. - 1297.203.]

1297.201.

The parties may agree on the place of arbitration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.202.

Failing any agreement referred to in Section 1297.201, the place of arbitration shall be determined by the arbitral tribunal having regard to the circumstances of the case, including the convenience of the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.203.

Notwithstanding Section 1297.201, the arbitral tribunal may, unless otherwise agreed by the parties, meet at any place it considers appropriate for consultation among its members, for hearing witnesses, experts, or the parties, or for inspection of documents, goods, or other property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Commencement of Arbitral Proceedings [1297.211. - 1297.211.]

1297.211.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, the arbitral proceedings in respect of a particular dispute commence on the date on which a request for that dispute to be referred to arbitration is received by the respondent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Language [1297.221. - 1297.224.]

1297.221.

The parties may agree upon the language or languages to be used in the arbitral proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.222.

Failing any agreement referred to in Section 1297.221, the arbitral tribunal shall determine the language or languages to be used in the arbitral proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.223.

The agreement or determination, unless otherwise specified, shall apply to any written statement by a party, any hearing, and any arbitral award, decision, or other communication by the arbitral tribunal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.224.

The arbitral tribunal may order that any documentary evidence shall be accompanied by a translation into the language or languages agreed upon by the parties or determined by the arbitral tribunal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Statements of Claim and Defense [1297.231. - 1297.233.]

1297.231.

Within the period of time agreed upon by the parties or determined by the arbitral tribunal, the claimant shall state the facts supporting his or her claim, the points at issue, and the relief or remedy sought, and the respondent shall state his or her defense in respect of these particulars, unless the parties have otherwise agreed as to the required elements of those statements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.232.

The parties may submit with their statements all documents they consider to be relevant or may add a reference to the documents or other evidence they will submit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.233.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, either party may amend or supplement his or her claim or defense during the course of the arbitral proceedings, unless the arbitral tribunal considers it inappropriate to allow the amendment or supplement having regard to the delay in making it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Hearings and Written Proceedings [1297.241. - 1297.245.]

1297.241.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, the arbitral tribunal shall decide whether to hold oral hearings for the presentation of evidence or for oral argument, or whether the proceedings shall be conducted on the basis of documents and other materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.242.

Unless the parties have agreed that no oral hearings shall be held, the arbitral tribunal shall hold oral hearings at an appropriate state of the proceedings, if so requested by a party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.243.

The parties shall be given sufficient advance notice of any hearing and of any meeting of the arbitral tribunal for the purpose of inspection of documents, goods, or other property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.244.

All statements, documents, or other information supplied to, or applications made to, the arbitral tribunal by one party shall be communicated to the other party, and any expert report or evidentiary document on which the arbitral tribunal may rely in making its decision shall be communicated to the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.245.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, all oral hearings and meetings in arbitral proceedings shall be held in camera.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Default of a Party [1297.251. - 1297.253.]

1297.251.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, where, without showing sufficient cause, the claimant fails to communicate his or her statement of claim in accordance with Sections 1297.231 and 1297.232, the arbitral tribunal shall terminate the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.252.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, where, without showing sufficient cause, the respondent fails to communicate his or her statement of defense in accordance with Sections 1297.231 and 1297.232, the arbitral tribunal shall continue the proceedings without treating that failure in itself as an admission of the claimant’s allegations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.253.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, where, without showing sufficient cause, a party fails to appear at an oral hearing or to produce documentary evidence, the arbitral tribunal may continue with the proceedings and make the arbitral award on the evidence before it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Expert Appointed by Arbitral Tribunal [1297.261. - 1297.262.]

1297.261.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, the arbitral tribunal may appoint one or more experts to report to it on specific issues to be determined by the arbitral tribunal, and require a party to give the expert any relevant information or to produce, or to provide access to, any relevant documents, goods, or other property for his or her inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.262.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, if a party so requests or if the arbitral tribunal considers it necessary, the expert shall, after delivery of his or her written or oral report, participate in an oral hearing where the parties have the opportunity to question the expert and to present expert witnesses on the points at issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Court Assistance in Taking Evidence and Consolidating Arbitrations [1297.271. - 1297.273.]

1297.271.

The arbitral tribunal, or a party with the approval of the arbitral tribunal, may request from the superior court assistance in taking evidence and the court may execute the request within its competence and according to its rules on taking evidence. In addition, a subpoena may issue as provided in Section 1282.6, in which case the witness compensation provisions of Section 1283.2 shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.272.

Where the parties to two or more arbitration agreements have agreed, in their respective arbitration agreements or otherwise, to consolidate the arbitrations arising out of those arbitration agreements, the superior court may, on application by one party with the consent of all the other parties to those arbitration agreements, do one or more of the following:

(a) Order the arbitrations to be consolidated on terms the court considers just and necessary.

(b) Where all the parties cannot agree on
an arbitral tribunal for the consolidated arbitration, appoint an arbitral tribunal in accordance with Section 1297.118.

(c) Where all the parties cannot agree on any other matter necessary to conduct the consolidated arbitration, make any other order it considers necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.273.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the parties to two or more arbitrations from agreeing to consolidate those arbitrations and taking any steps that are necessary to effect that consolidation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Making of Arbitral Award and Termination of Proceedings [1297.281. - 1297.337.]



  ARTICLE 1. Rules Applicable to Substance of Dispute [1297.281. - 1297.285.]

1297.281.

The arbitral tribunal shall decide the dispute in accordance with the rules of law designated by the parties as applicable to the substance of the dispute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.282.

Any designation by the parties of the law or legal system of a given state shall be construed, unless otherwise expressed, as directly referring to the substantive law of that state and not to its conflict of laws rules.
